Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.170

Successive owners liable.

Every successive owner of property who neglects to abate a continuing nuisance upon, or in the use of such property caused by a former owner, is liable therefor in the same manner as the one who first created it.

[Code 1881 s 1239; 1875 p 79 s 5; RRS s 9917.]